Louisiana, session 2026, HB267.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:1474(B) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1474. Louisiana State Board of Home Inspectors; creation; qualifications;
domicile; terms of office; confirmation; oath of office; compensation
* * *
B.(1) The board shall be composed of one member from each congressional
district and one at-large member appointed by the governor from a list of names
submitted by the board of directors of the Louisiana Chapter of the American Society
of Home Inspectors, the Louisiana Realtors Association, and the Louisiana Home
Builders Association. Names of qualified candidates may be submitted to the
governor by any active home inspector licensed in this state who resides within the
district of the board vacancy. Both the candidates for the board and the licensees
submitting names of candidates shall have all of the following qualifications:
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 267 ENROLLED
(a) Held a license for at least three years.
(b) Not been found guilty of any violations of the board rules or licensing
law within the preceding three years.
(c) Be in good standing with the board.
(2) Each member of the board shall be a United States citizen and a resident
of the state, and shall have been actively engaged in the home inspection business
on a full-time basis for three years preceding the appointment. The initial board
members shall be required to obtain a license in accordance with the provisions of
this Chapter. Thereafter, each member of the board shall be a licensed home
inspector.
* * *
D.(1) Initially, one member of the board shall be appointed for a two-year
term, three members for four-year terms, and three members for six-year terms. No
person shall be appointed for more than one full six-year term. On and after
August 1, 2017, all members shall be appointed for four years. Except as provided
in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection for the at-large member, any Each member of the
board shall be appointed for a term of four years. A member may serve two
four-year terms; however, a formal nomination is required for reappointment to a
second consecutive term. No member shall serve more than a total of two terms on
the board, whether by consecutive or non-consecutive terms or serving at-large. A
board member whose term has ended may continue to serve until a replacement has
been appointed by the governor. This interim service shall not count toward the term
limits provided in this Subsection. Any vacancy on the board caused by death,
resignation, or disability of a member shall be filled for the unexpired term by
appointment by the governor from the congressional district where the vacancy
occurred.
(2) On and after August 1, 2017, the board member from the Third
Congressional District who was appointed to the board on July 27, 2012, is
designated as the at-large member. Any vacancy of the at-large member caused by
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 267 ENROLLED
death, resignation, or disability shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment
by the governor.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.